src/fst/affixes/irregularverbs.lexc
LEXICON ODHAN/GenPastRedNom
     +1Sg+Red+Nom:0%<idhaah%>day            Clitics ;
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:t%<idhaah%>day            Clitics ;
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:y%<idhaah%>day            Clitics ;
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:t%<idhaah%>day            Clitics ;
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:n%<idhaah%>nay            Clitics ;
     +2Pl+Red+Nom:t%<idhaah%>deen        Clitics ;
     +3Pl+Red+Nom:y%<idhaah%>deen        Clitics ;

     +1Sg+Red+Nom:0%<iraah%>day         STY/R ;
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:t%<iraah%>day         STY/R ;
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:y%<iraah%>day         STY/R ;
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:t%<iraah%>day         STY/R ;
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:n%<iraah%>nay         STY/R ;
     +2Pl+Red+Nom:t%<iraah%>deen     STY/R ;
     +3Pl+Red+Nom:y%<iraah%>deen     STY/R ;

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPastRedAbs
     +1Sg+Red+Abs:0%<idhi´         Clitics ; !      idhi´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:y%<idhi´         Clitics ; !     yidhi´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:y%<idhi´         Clitics ; !     yidhi´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:t%<idhi´         Clitics ; !     tidhi´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:n%<idhi´         Clitics ; !     nidhi´
     +2Pl+Red+Abs:y%<idhi´         Clitics ; !     yidhi´
     +3Pl+Red+Abs:y%<idhi´         Clitics ; !     yidhi´

    ! Southern dialect?
     +1Sg+Red+Abs:0%<iri´          STY/R ; !    iri´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:y%<iri´          STY/R ; !   yiri´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:y%<iri´          STY/R ; !   yiri´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:t%<iri´          STY/R ; !   tiri´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:n%<iri´          STY/R ; !   niri´
     +2Pl+Red+Abs:y%<iri´          STY/R ; !   yiri´
     +3Pl+Red+Abs:y%<iri´          STY/R ; !   yiri´

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPastNeg
    +Sg:odhan               Clitics ; ! odha´n
    +Pl:odhanin             Clitics ; ! odhani´n
    +Sg:oran               STY/R ; ! odha´n
    +Pl:oranin             STY/R ; ! odhani´n

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPres
     +1Sg:0%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;
     +2Sg:t%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;
    +3SgM:y%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;
    +3SgF:t%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;
     +1Pl:n%<idhaah%>naa            Clitics ;
     +2Pl:t%<idhaah%>daan           Clitics ;
     +3Pl:y%<idhaah%>daan           Clitics ;

     +1Sg:0%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;
     +2Sg:t%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;
    +3SgM:y%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;
    +3SgF:t%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;
     +1Pl:n%<iraah%>naa         STY/R ;
     +2Pl:t%<iraah%>daan       STY/R ;
     +3Pl:y%<iraah%>daan       STY/R ;

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPresRedNom
     +1Sg+Red+Nom:0%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;   !    idhaahdaa
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:y%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;   !   yidhaahdaa
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:y%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;   !   yidhaahdaa
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:t%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;   !   tidhaahdaa
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:n%<idhaah%>daa            Clitics ;   !   nidhaahdaa
     +2Pl+Red+Nom:y%<idhaah%>daa         Clitics ;   !   yidhaahdaa
     +3Pl+Red+Nom:y%<idhaah%>daa         Clitics ;   !   yidhaahdaa

     +1Sg+Red+Nom:0%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;     !    idhaahdaa
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:y%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;     !   yidhaahdaa
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:y%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;     !   yidhaahdaa
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:t%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;     !   tidhaahdaa
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:n%<iraah%>daa         STY/R ;     !   nidhaahdaa
     +2Pl+Red+Nom:y%<iraah%>daa          STY/R ;     !   yidhaahdaa
     +3Pl+Red+Nom:y%<iraah%>daa          STY/R ;     !   yidhaahdaa

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPresRedAbs
     +1Sg+Red+Abs:0%<idhaah%>da´            Clitics ;   !    idhaahda´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:y%<idhaah%>da´            Clitics ;   !   yidhaahda´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:y%<idhaah%>da´            Clitics ;   !   yidhaahda´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:t%<idhaah%>da´            Clitics ;   !   tidhaahda´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:n%<idhaah%>da´            Clitics ;   !   nidhaahda´
     +2Pl+Red+Abs:y%<idhaah%>da´         Clitics ;   !   yidhaahda´
     +3Pl+Red+Abs:y%<idhaah%>da´         Clitics ;   !   yidhaahda´

     +1Sg+Red+Abs:0%<iraah%>da´         STY/R ;     !    idhaahda´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:y%<iraah%>da´         STY/R ;     !   yidhaahda´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:y%<iraah%>da´         STY/R ;     !   yidhaahda´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:t%<iraah%>da´         STY/R ;     !   tidhaahda´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:n%<iraah%>da´         STY/R ;     !   nidhaahda´
     +2Pl+Red+Abs:y%<iraah%>da´          STY/R ;     !   yidhaahda´
     +3Pl+Red+Abs:y%<iraah%>da´          STY/R ;     !   yidhaahda´

LEXICON ODHAN/GenPresRel
     +1Sg+Rel:0%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     !  idhaahdo´
     +2Sg+Rel:t%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! tidhaahdo´
    +3SgM+Rel:y%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! yidhaahdo´
    +3SgF+Rel:t%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! tidhaahdo´
     +1Pl+Rel:n%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! nidhaahno´
     +2Pl+Rel:t%<idhaah%>daan´´      Clitics ;        ! tidhaahda´an
     +3Pl+Rel:y%<idhaah%>daan´´      Clitics ;        ! yidhaahda´an

     +1Sg+Rel:0%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     !  idhaahdo´
     +2Sg+Rel:t%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! tidhaahdo´
    +3SgM+Rel:y%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! yidhaahdo´
    +3SgF+Rel:t%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! tidhaahdo´
     +1Pl+Rel:n%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! nidhaahno´
     +2Pl+Rel:t%<iraah%>daan´        STY/R ;     ! tidhaahda´an
     +3Pl+Rel:y%<iraah%>daan´        STY/R ;     ! yidhaahda´an


LEXICON ODHAN/GenPresNeg
     +1Sg:0%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     !  idhaahdo´
     +2Sg:t%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! tidhaahdo´
    +3SgM:y%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! yidhaahdo´
    +3SgF:t%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! tidhaahdo´
     +1Pl:n%<idhaah%>do´            Clitics ;     ! nidhaahno´
     +2Pl:t%<idhaah%>daan´´      Clitics ;     ! tidhaahda´an
     +3Pl:y%<idhaah%>daan´´      Clitics ;     ! yidhaahda´an

     +1Sg:0%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     !  idhaahdo´
     +2Sg:t%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! tidhaahdo´
    +3SgM:y%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! yidhaahdo´
    +3SgF:t%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! tidhaahdo´
     +1Pl:n%<iraah%>do´         STY/R ;     ! nidhaahno´
     +2Pl:t%<iraah%>daan´´       STY/R ;     ! tidhaahda´an
     +3Pl:y%<iraah%>daan´´       STY/R ;     ! yidhaahda´an

LEXICON ODHAN/Imp
    +Sg:dheh        Clitics ;       ! dhe´h
    +Pl:dhaha       Clitics ;   ! dha´ha

    +Neg+Sg:odhan   Clitics ;     ! o´dhan
    +Neg+Sg:odhanin Clitics ;     ! o´dhanin
    +Neg+Pl:odhanina Clitics ;  ! odhani´na
    ! Unclear on whether these exist, but doing them for consistency
    +Sg:reh     STY/R ;     ! dhe´h
    +Pl:raha        STY/R ;     ! dha´ha

    +Neg+Sg:oran    STY/R ;     ! o´dhan
    +Neg+Sg:oranin  STY/R ;     ! o´dhanin
    +Neg+Pl:oranina STY/R ;     ! odhani´na

LEXICON STY/R
    +Sty/R+Use/NG:      FINAL ;
